New Jersey, session 222, A1959.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in P.L.    , c.    (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): "Board" means the Board of Public Utilities or any successor agency. "Cable television company" or "CATV company" means a company as that term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1972, c.186 (C.48:5A-3), that provides cable television service to the public within this State. "Credit card customer" means a customer who agrees to allow a telecommunications company, electric public utility, gas public utility or cable television company to automatically bill the customer's credit card for service received during each billing cycle. "Direct debit customer" means a customer who agrees to allow a telecommunications company, electric public utility, gas public utility or cable television company to automatically deduct payments from the customer's bank account for service received during each billing cycle. "Electric public utility" means a public utility as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that transmits and distributes electricity to end users within this State. "Gas public utility" means a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that distributes natural gas to end users within this State. "Telecommunications company" means a company authorized by the board to provide telecommunications services to the public in this State including, but not limited to, a carrier authorized by the board to provide local telecommunications services or long-distance telecommunications services or both. "Telecommunications service" means any telecommunications service which is subject to regulation by the board pursuant to Title 48 of the Revised Statutes. 2.   a. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule, regulation or order to the contrary, the board shall prohibit any telecommunications company, electric public utility, gas public utility or cable television company from charging a credit card customer or direct debit customer for telecommunications service, gas service, electric service or cable television service, as the case may be, prior to the actual billing due date for service within each billing cycle that would apply if the customer elected to pay for service by cash, money order or personal check, unless the customer 1[expressly]1 agrees 1[in writing]1 to be charged for service on an earlier date. b.    Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection a. of this section to the contrary, the board shall allow a telecommunications company, electric public utility, gas public utility or cable television company to charge a credit card customer or direct debit customer for telecommunications service, gas service, electric service or cable television service, as the case may be, prior to the actual billing due date for service within a billing cycle if the customer requests a company or utility to do so by making such request by telephonic communication to the company or utility or by any other means that the board approves. 3.    The board may, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) adopt such rules and regulations, as shall be necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 4.    This act shall take effect 90 days after enactment but the board may take administrative actions in advance to effectuate the purposes of this act.